Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1064.02
Sections, how construed.

Sections 25-1062.01 and 25-1064 to 25-1064.02 shall in no way limit a person's right to an injunction or temporary restraining order if such remedies are specifically authorized by statute.

Laws 1986, LB 516, § 13.